Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1237YH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 811 DIVISION I 1 SCHOOL TUITION ORGANIZATION TAX CREDITS ââ REPEAL 2 Section 1. Section 422.11S, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the credits 5 allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by a school 6 tuition organization tax credit equal to seventy-five percent 7 of the amount of the voluntary cash or noncash contributions 8 made by the taxpayer during the tax year to a school tuition 9 organization before July 1, 2025 , subject to the total dollar 10 value of the organizationâs tax credit certificates as computed 11 in subsection 8 . The tax credit shall be claimed by use of a 12 tax credit certificate as provided in subsection 7 . 13 Sec. 2. Section 422.11S, subsection 7, paragraph b, Code 14 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 b. The department shall authorize a school tuition 16 organization to issue tax credit certificates for contributions 17 made to the school tuition organization before July 1, 18 2025 . The aggregate amount of tax credit certificates 19 that the department shall authorize for a school tuition 20 organization for a calendar year shall be determined for that 21 organization pursuant to subsection 8 . However, a school 22 tuition organization shall not be authorized to issue tax 23 credit certificates unless the organization is controlled by a 24 board of directors consisting of at least seven members. The 25 names and addresses of the members shall be provided to the 26 department and shall be made available by the department to the 27 public, notwithstanding any state confidentiality restrictions. 28 Sec. 3. Section 422.11S, subsection 8, paragraph a, 29 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 (2) âTotal approved tax creditsâ means for the 2006 calendar 31 year, two million five hundred thousand dollars, for the 32 2007 calendar year, five million dollars, for calendar years 33 beginning on or after January 1, 2008, but before January 1, 34 2012, seven million five hundred thousand dollars, for calendar 35 -1- LSB 1237YH (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 811 years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, but before January 1 1, 2014, eight million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, 2 for calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, but 3 before January 1, 2019, twelve million dollars, for calendar 4 years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, but before January 5 1, 2020, thirteen million dollars, for calendar years beginning 6 on or after January 1, 2020, but before January 1, 2022, 7 fifteen million dollars, and for calendar years beginning on 8 or after January 1, 2022, but before January 1, 2026, twenty 9 million dollars , and for calendar years beginning on or after 10 January 1, 2025, but before January 1, 2026, ten million 11 dollars . 12 Sec. 4. Section 422.11S, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. This section is repealed July 1, 2031. 15 DIVISION II 16 REPEAL OF SCHOOL TUITION ORGANIZATION TAX CREDIT ââ FUTURE 17 CHANGES 18 Sec. 5. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph b, 19 subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 20 subparagraph. 21 Sec. 6. Section 22A.6, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2025, 22 is amended by striking the paragraph. 23 Sec. 7. Section 422.33, subsection 28, Code 2025, is amended 24 by striking the subsection. 25 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 26 effect July 1, 2031. 27